Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.600

Notice and hearing.

(1) All petitions filed under RCW 11.130.595 for the establishment of a protective arrangement shall be heard within sixty days unless an extension of time is requested by a party or the court visitor within such sixty-day period and granted for good cause shown.

(2)(a) A copy of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the court visitor appointed under RCW 11.130.605 not more than five court days after the petition under RCW 11.130.595 has been filed.

(b) A copy of a petition under RCW 11.130.580 and notice of a hearing on the petition must be served personally on the respondent and the court visitor appointed under RCW 11.130.605 not more than five court days after the petition under RCW 11.130.595 has been filed. The notice must inform the respondent of the respondent's rights at the hearing, including the right to an attorney and to attend the hearing. The notice must include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of granting the petition for a protective arrangement. The court may not grant the petition if notice substantially complying with this subsection is not served on the respondent.

(3) In a proceeding on a petition under RCW 11.130.580, the notice required under subsection (2) of this section must be given to the persons required to be listed in the petition under RCW 11.130.595 (1) through (3) and any other person interested in the respondent's welfare the court determines. Failure to give notice under this subsection does not preclude the court from granting the petition.

(4) After the court has ordered a protective arrangement under this article, notice of a hearing on a petition filed under this chapter, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to the respondent and any other person the court determines.

[ 2020 c 312 s 316; 2019 c 437 s 505.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.